Mississippi, session 2026, HB87.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 41-29-147, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-29-147.  Except as otherwise provided in Section 41-29-142, any person convicted of a second or subsequent offense under this article may be imprisoned for a term up to twice the term otherwise authorized, fined an amount up to twice that otherwise authorized, or both. For purposes of this section, an offense is considered a second or subsequent offense, if, prior to his or her conviction of the offense, the offender has at any time been convicted and sentenced to separate terms of one (1) year or more under this article or under any statute of the United States or of any state relating to narcotic drugs, marihuana, depressant, stimulant or hallucinogenic drugs, upon charges separately brought and arising out of separate incidents at different times. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.